Ohio, session 136, HB972.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3902.78 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3902.78. No health plan issuer, including a pharmacy benefit manager or other third-party administrator, with respect to the provision of pharmacy or pharmacist services under a health benefit plan, shall prohibit, restrict, or impose a penalty on a pharmacy, pharmacist, or personally furnishing prescriber, for, directly or through a third party, offering services or products to increase transparency and prescription drug access for patients, including any of the following: (A) Simplified payment processes, electronic payments, or payment plans; (B) Adherence support services or communications; (C) Information regarding patient out-of-pocket drug costs or alternative medication options; (D) Utilizing electronic transactions that allow a pharmacist or pharmacy to provide patients with information about prescription drug costs and benefits; (E) Utilizing electronic transactions that allow a pharmacist or pharmacy to provide a patient with prior authorization support for a prescription drug; (F) Sharing patient claims data or other health care transaction data with the patient, the patient's health care provider and the provider's business associates, or any third party authorized by the patient, when the pharmacist or pharmacy processes the claim or other electronic transaction, or at any time thereafter; (G) As permitted by state and federal law, providing prescription drug copayment assistance or other out-of-pocket cost support to patients for prescription drugs.